fi: Voimansiirto: Hihna; Ketju; Suora; Muu
de: Antriebsmechanismus: Riemen; Kette; Direkt; Sonstige
hu: Meghajtó mechanizmus: Szíj; Lánc; Közvetlen; Egyéb
nl: Aandrijving mechanisme: Riem; Ketting; Direct; Overige
ja: 駆動メカニズム: ベルト; チェーン; ダイレクト; その他
es: Mecanismo de transmisión: Correa; Cadena; Directo; Otro
ko: 구동 메커니즘: 벨트; 체인; 다이렉트; 기타
vi: Cơ cấu truyền động: Dây đai; Xích; Trực tiếp; Khác
pt-PT: Mecanismo de acionamento: Correia; Corrente; Direto; Outro
sv: Drivmekanism: Rem; Kedja; Direkt; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип задвижващ механизъм: Ремък; Верига; Директно; Друго
en: Drive mechanism: Belt; Chain; Direct; Other
nb: Drivmekanisme: Reim; Kjede; Direkte; Annet
fr: Mécanisme d’entraînement: Courroie; Chaîne; Direct; Autre
th: กลไกขับเคลื่อน: สายพาน; โซ่; ไดเรกต์; อื่นๆ
it: meccanismo di azionamento: A cinghia; A catena; Diretta; Altro
pl: Mechanizm napędowy: Pasek; Łańcuch; Bezpośredni; Inne
tr: Tahrik mekanizması: Kayış; Zincir; Doğrudan; Diğer
sk-SK: Pohonný mechanizmus: Remeň; Reťaz; Priamy; Iné
zh-CN: 传动机构: 皮带; 链条; 直驱; 其他
lt-LT: Pavaros mechanizmas: Diržas; Grandinė; Tiesioginė; Kita
cs: Pohonný mechanismus: Řemen; Řetěz; Přímý; Jiné
zh-TW: 驅動機構: 皮帶; 鏈條; 直驅; 其他
ro-RO: Mecanismul de acționare: Curea; Lanț; Direct; Altele
da: Drivmekanisme: Rem; Kæde; Direkte; Andet
sl-SI: Pogonski mehanizem: Jermen; Veriga; Neposredni pogon; Drugo
pt-BR: Mecanismo de acionamento: Correia; Corrente; Direto; Outros
ru: Механизм привода: Ременный; Цепной; Прямой; Другое
el: Μηχανισμός μετάδοσης κίνησης: Ιμάντας; Αλυσίδα; Άμεση; Άλλο
hr-HR: Pogonski mehanizam: Remen; Lanac; Izravni; Ostalo